California, session 20252026, AB1226.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 41853 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:41853. (a) The state board shall designate public fire protection agencies or other equivalent agencies to oversee agricultural burning activities and to issue permits pursuant to Section 41852. The state board shall adopt rules and regulations to ensure those activities are conducted safely and effectively and to provide a procedure for the issuance of the permits. Each agency designated by the state board pursuant to this section shall issue permits subject to the rules and regulations of the state board.(b) Notwithstanding Section 41852, wildland vegetation management burning, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 39011, shall be exempt from the permitting requirements of Section 41852 and from Section 41701 if that activity is conducted by, or under the supervision of, the applicable public fire protection agency or other equivalent agency designated by the state board pursuant to subdivision (a).(c) The state board shall develop guidelines and best practices best practices and guidelines for wildland vegetation management burning to ensure public safety and environmental protection.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.